Massachusetts, session 194th, S2424.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 2 of chapter 90, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the words “are veterans, as defined in clause Forty-third of section 7 
of chapter 4” the following words:- , section 1 of chapter 115, or who is eligible for the annuity 
provided under section 6C of said chapter 115 
SECTION 2.  Said section 2 of chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in lines 466 through 469, inclusive, the sentence: “There shall be an annual $20 fee 
for such "VETERAN'' plates in addition to the established registration fee for private passenger 
motor vehicles and motorcycles.” and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- Any 
such “VETERAN” plate shall be issued without fee other than the established registration fee for 
private passenger motor vehicles and motorcycles.